src/phonology/smn-phon.twolc
"xx:x consonant gradation and shortening and x:x shortening"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\   weak grade or consonant shortening 
Cx:0 <=> Vow: _ Cy: WeakGrade \%^CLEN: ; !RULE RC !! 1) when WG
         Vow: _ Cy: ConsonantShorting \%^CLEN:  ; !RULE RC !! 2) when CSH  
	where Cx in ( b c c  č  č d đ f g h j k k  l m n ŋ p p  r s š v z ž ) !t in other rule
	      Cy in ( b c c4 č4 č d đ f g h j k k4 l m n ŋ p p4 r s š v z ž ) 
		  matched ;


!!€ vi^RVššâ^CSH^RVSH>vettee
!!€ vi00šâ00>vettee


!!€ la^RVs^RCe^SVtt^RLEN^SLEN>vettee
!!€ laas0ee0t00>vettee

!cuozzâ:cuozâ
!!€ cuozzâ^WG^RLEN>
!!€ cuo0zâ00>

!váddu:váádun
!!€ vá^RVddu^CSH^RLEN>n
!!€ váá0du00>n


"tt:t  - final consonant and consonant gradation"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ consonant gradation, and 3syll verbs in -tt lose t in front of cns-initial suff
t:0 <=> Vow:                _ [t:|t4:] WeakGrade \%^CLEN: ; !RULE SC !! 1) WG, not CLEN
        Vow:                _ [t:|t4:] ConsonantShorting \%^CLEN:  ; !RULE SC !! 2) CSH
        [RealVow:|%^SV:|%>] _ [t:|t4:] (i6:) Triggers:* [.#.| %>] \Vow  ; !RULE SC !! 3) uáivátt : uáivát
        [RealVow:|%^SV:]    _ [t:|t4:] m Triggers:* [.#.| %>]  ; !RULE SC !! 4) olášuttem:olášutmân
        Vow: Vow:           _  t:       %> â n  ; !RULE SC !! 5) uáiváátt>ân uáiváátân
       [.#.|#] Cns:* :Vow+ Cns:+ :Vow+  Cns:+ i _  t:      %> i [j|ž|š]  ; !RULE SC !! 6) uápásmittijm>uápásmitijm

!!€ kulluutt^SVSH>
!!€ kullu00t0>

!!€ las^RCe^SVtt^CLEN^SLEN>
!!€ lassee0t00>

"nnj to nj shortening weak grade and consonant shortening"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  special rule, e.g. konnjâl -> konjâlân puánnjá
n:0 <=> n _ j ConsonantShorting \%^CLEN: ;!RULE RC !! 1)  vinnjooh:vinjohân
        n _ j WeakGrade \%^CLEN: ; !RULE RC !! 2)lonnjâ:loonjáin 


"Word final consonant deletion"                 
!!  * __@RULENAME@__ \\ for vaskâm:vaaskâ
Cx:0 <=> _ ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) %^FCD: ;  !RULE SC
          where Cx in (d n m t v j s š) ;

!rejected, look at this:
!!€ va^RVskâm^FCD^RLEN
!!€ vaaskâ000

!!€ njuolgâd^FCD^RVSH
!!€ njuolgâ000

	
"Final m in stems, smm to sm"  
!!  * __@RULENAME@__ \\ 
m:0 <=>  s _ m [Triggers: - %^FCD:]* [.#.|%>]   ; !RULE SC !! 1) puttáás_min 
         s _   [Triggers: - %^FCD:]*      %>  m ; !RULE SC !! 2) stoorgâs_mân  sto%^RVrgâsm



!"Stem final geminate shortening in front of consonant-initial suffix"
!Cx:0 <=> Vow _ Cx %> Cns ;
!     where Cx in (d l š);


"Wordfinal consonants part 1"
!! * __@RULENAME@__  e%^RVlâčč
Cx:0 <=> Vow: _ Cy: (%^CLEN:) (%^RLEN:) (%^SLEN:|%^SVSH:) [.#.| %>] \Sgm: ; !! 1)
         Vow: _  [Cy | č:š] [Triggers: - %^FCD:]* %> [d|m|v] ; !! 2)jurdâččmân:jurdâšmân ju%^RVrdâčč%^RLEN%>mân
	 Vow: _ Cy %> Cns ; !! 3)  šš>š in hárávušš>vetteđ 
	where Cx in ( d č š l h ) 
	      Cy in ( d č š l č )
		  matched ;


!!€ hárávušš>vetteđ
!!€ hárávu0š>vetteđ

!!€ konnjâl^CSH>ân
!!€ kon0jâl0>ân

!!€ suán^RCju^CLEN>n
!!€ suánnju0>n

!rejected, look at this: (changed a:0 to 2nd a)
!!€ haamit^SC^CSH^SVSH>ist
!!€ ha0mitt00>ist

!!€ su^RVkk4á^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ su0hháá000>st

! rejected: (but error in test: CLEN but p, and ^SVN???)
! kopp^RCâ^WG^CLEN^SVN>in
! ko0p0á000>in




!! !Consonant lengthening
 
         
"Lengthening of root consonant x:yy"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  consonant lengthening after WG - h:vv, p:vv, c:ss
%^RC:Cy <=> Vow: Cx:Cy _ :Vow+ Cns:* [Triggers: - %^FCD:]* %^WG: %^CLEN: (%^VHIGH:|%^VBACK:) (%^RVSH:) ([%^SVLOW: |%^SLEN:]) %> [ i:|s|u|o|ž |e h | e m | á] ; !RULE RC
	where Cx in ( h p c )
	      Cy in ( v v s ) 
		  matched ;

!kassa:kassaast
!!€ ka^RVss^RCa^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ ka0ss0aa000>st

!vahe vavveest
!!€ va^RVh^RCe^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ va0vvee000>st

!vahe vahheen
!!€ va^RVh^RCe^SV^CLEN^SLEN>n
!!€ va0hhee00>n


"Lengthening of half-long root consonant x:xx"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  riččá piiru piirrun niisu niissun
%^RC:Cy <=> Vow:  Cx _ :Vow+ Sgm:* Triggers:* %^CLEN: ; !RULE RC  !! Cx, not Cx:  čeec%^RCi%^CLEN%>n
 	where Cx in ( b c č d g k l r s h m n đ v ŋ p š z ž t )  
 	      Cy in ( b c č d g k l r s h m n đ v ŋ p š z ž t ) 
 		  matched ;


"Lengthening of consonant h5"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\    this one does not fit into the general rule because of h5:h
%^RC:Cy <=> Vow:  Cx:Cy _ Vow:+ Cns:* Triggers:* %^CLEN: ; !RULE RC 
	where Cx in ( h5 )  
	      Cy in ( h  )   
		  matched ;

!!€ put^RCe^SVst^CLEN^SLEN>
!!€ putteest00>

!kiär%^RCun%^CLEN%>ttáá

!!€ ke^RVp^RCidm^CLEN^RLEN^SLEN>ân
!!€ keeppidm000>ân  

!kiehâ  kievváin
!!€ kieh^RCâ^WG^CLEN^SVLOW>in
!!€ kievvá000>in

!iše iššeest
!!€ i^RVšš^RCe^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ i0šš0ee000>st

!!€ kol^RCe^CLEN>
!!€ kolle0>

!!€ kiel^RCâ^CLEN>n
!!€ kiellâ0>n

"č:ij part 1"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  
č:i <=> Vow: _ %^RC:  WeakGrade %^CLEN: ; !RULE RC  !!  eeč%^RCi:eijijn eeč%^RCi%^WG%^CLEN%^SVLOW%>in

"Lengthening root consonant j:ij 1"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  for saje:saijeen 
j:i <=> Vow: _ %^RC: :Vow (Cns:+) (%^SV:) Cns:* %^CLEN: ([%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:]) (%^SLEN:) [.#.| %>] ; !RULE RC !!Par Ess


"č:ij and j:ij part 2"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  
%^RC:j <=> Vow: č:i _ WeakGrade %^CLEN: ; !RULE RC !! 1)  eeč%^RCi:eijijn
           Vow: j:i _ Vow:+ (%^SV:) Cns:*  %^CLEN: ; !RULE RC !! 2) syej%^RCi3%^CLEN%^RVSH%>in suoijijn

!!€ sa^RVj^RCe^SV^CLEN^SLEN>n
!!€ sa0ijee00>n

!!€ pááj^RCá^CLEN>n
!!€ pááijá0>n

!!€ vaj^RCe^SVd^CLEN^SLEN>
!!€ vaijeed00>




"nj to nnj consonant lengthening"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  special rule, suánju : suánnjun for Par and Ess
%^RC:n <=> Vow: n _ j RealVow: %^CLEN: %> [ d | n ] ; !RULE RC



"Consonant lengthening after xx:x and xy:zy weak grade with x4 on upper side"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\   k4, č, p4  kukse:kuvssijn  
%^RC:Cx <=> Vow:  Cy:  Cz: _ WeakGrade %^CLEN:  ; !RULE RC
        where Cy in ( č  p  k m  m ŋ h h  h l l l h k4 k4 r r r v v ) 
              Cz in ( č  p4 s p  s k c t  č c č p c s  š c š t c č ) 
              Cx in ( j  v  s p  s k c t  č c č p c s  š c š t c č ) 
        matched ;


"Consonant lengthening xy:xyy"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ 
%^RC:Cx <=> Vow:  Cy:  Cz: _ Vow:+ Cns:+ %^CLEN:  ;  !RULE RC
        where Cy in ( k m  m ŋ h h  h l l l h r r r v v ) 
              Cz in ( s p  s k c t  č c č p c c š t c č ) 
              Cx in ( s p  s k c t  č c č p c c š t c č ) 
        matched ;



!! !Stem consonant and suffix consonant 


"Assimilation of consonants t d š"
!! * __@RULENAME@__  delet t in front of -ttáá, avoid -tttáá
Cy:0  <=>  Sgm:  _ (%^CSH:) (%^RLEN:) %> Cy Cy ;  !RULE SC
	where Cy in ( d t š)
		  matched ;

!!€ haamit>ttáá
!!€ haami0>ttáá



"Wordfinal consonants part 2"
!! * __@RULENAME@__  e%^RVlâčč cummâlâhč:cummâlâhš
č:š  <=>  Vow: [č:|h:] _ Triggers:* [.#.| %>] \Sgm: ; !RULE SC
          Vow:  č:0    _ Triggers:* %> [d|m|v] ; !RULE SC jurdâččmân:jurdâšmân

"Final consonant x:xx"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  pottáák potákkân  
%^SC:Cx <=> Cx _ Triggers:* [%>|.#.] ; !RULE SC
        where Cx in ( k l n p t ) ;

!rejected:
!!€ kahhaan^SC^CSH^RVSH>ist
!!€ ka0ha0nj00>ist

"Clitic devoicing"
Cx:Cy <=> :UnvoicedCns (UnvoicedCns:) Triggers:* %> #: _ ;
      where Cx in (b6 d6 g6 )
      	    Cy in (p  t  k  )
	    matched ;



!! !!Vowel rules
!  =============
!  =============

!! !First syllable vowel shortening


!!€ koonnjâl^CSH>ân
!!€ ko0n0jâl0>ân

!!€ kappeer^CSH^SVSH>ist
!!€ ka0p0er00>ist

!!€ čäällim^CSH>ist
!!€ čä00lim0>ist

!This is not correct, Check it:
!!€ muusik^SC^CSH^RVSH>ist
!!€ mu0sikk00>ist

! kahhaan^SC^CSH^RVSH>ist
! ka0ha0n0j00>ist

!aarrân:arânân
!!€ aarrân^CSH>ân
!!€ a00rân0>ân

!rejected:
!!€ kiirrâs^RVSH>ân
!!€ ki0rrâs0>ân
 
 
 
"Vowel shortening VV:V"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ ráávhu- : rávhoid, käähir%^CSH%>id kuuđiâ%^RVSH%>žân
Vy:0 <=> Vx: _  Cns:+ [ Cns: - %^RC:0 ] [Vow: - u2:]  %^WG: (%^CLEN:) %^SVLOW: %> i: ; !RULE RV !! 1)
         Vx: _  Cns:+                   [Vow: - u2:]  %^WG:  %^CLEN:  %^RVSH:  %> [i:|e]  ; !RULE RV !! 2) čääci : čassijn
         Vx: _  Cns:+   [Vow: - u2:]+ Cns:* (%^CSH:) %^RVSH: (%^SVLOW:)  [%>|.#.]  ; !RULE RV !! 3) kaamuv kammust
         Vx: _ [Cns:+ - č:] [Vow: - u2:]+ Cns:+ ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) %^CSH: (%^SVSH:) [%>|.#.] ; !RULE RV !! 4) pááppár : pápárân páápp4ár%^ÁI%^WG%^RVSH%>id
         Vx: _ [Cns:+ - č:] [Vow: - u2:]+ Cns:+ ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) (%^FCD:) %^WG: %^RVSH: [%>|.#.] ; !RULE RV !! 5) pááppár : pápárân viijđás%^ÁE%^WG%^RVSH> 
         Vx: _  Cns:+    [Vow: - u2:]+ (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:)  %^RVSH: (%^SVSH:) [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV !! 6) njääh^RCe^CLEN^RVSH> = njähhe>
         [Vx: - :i] _  Cns:+      [Vow: - u2:]+ (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: %^RVSH: (%^SVSH:) [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV !! 6) njääh^RCe^CLEN^RVSH> = njähhe>
         Vx: _  Cns:+       Vow  Cns:* (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK:  %^RVSH: [%>|.#.] ; !RULE RV !! 7) njääh^RCe^CLEN^RVSH> = njähhe> 
       where Vx in ( a e i o u á ä y A E I O U Á Ä ) 
             Vy in ( a e i o u á ä y a e i o u á ä ) 
       matched ;

! čäällu2^VBACK^RVSH>čč>im
"Long vowel shortening"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ (example?), no ^CSH, since that gives Vy:0
Vy:0 <=> Vx: _ [Cns: - č:] Cns:* (%^RC:) [Vow: - u2:]  %^WG:  %^RVSH: %^SVLOW: [%>|.#.] \e ; !RULE RV !! 2st stems
         Vx: _  Cns:+         Vow:  Cns: %^CSH: %^RVSH: %^SVSH: [%>|.#.] ; !RULE RV !! 3syll kaavpug:kavpugân 
         Vx: _  Cns:+         Vow: (%^SV:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:  %^RVSH: [%>|.#.] ; !RULE RV !! táálhudem koomerdem
       where Vx in ( a e i o u y á ä ) 
             Vy in ( a e i o u y á ä ) 
       matched ;

"e:0 in passive"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\
e:0 <=>   e: _  Cns:+ u2:u   ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: %^RVSH:  [%>|.#.] ; !RULE RV 



!!€ mááh^RCu^WG^CLEN^SVLOW>in
!!€ má0vvo000>in
 
!!€ mool^RCâ^WG^RVSH>ttáá
!!€ mo0l0â00>ttáá



!"Long vowel shortening, before č:j "
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ special rule for getting ej̣ittáá instead of ej̣ittáá.
!Vy:0 <=> Vx: _ č: (%^RC:) Vow:  %^WG: %^RVSH: (%^SVLOW:) [%>|.#.] ; !RULE RV !!  2st stems
!     where Vx in ( a e i o u y á ä ) 
!           Vy in ( a e i o u y á ä ) 
!     matched ;
! Temporarily commented out due to conflict, have a look at this.

"Underlying long vowel shortening iä:e and ää:ä or a"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ čääh%^RCu2%^CLEN%^VBACK%>um
ä:0 <=> i: _  Cns:+ Vow:  Cns: [%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:] %^WG: %^RVSH:  [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV 
        ä: _  Cns:+ u2:o  Triggers:* %^RVSH:  [%>|.#.] ; !RULE RV !%^VBACK also?
        ä: _  Cns:+ u2:u   ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: %^RVSH:  [%>|.#.] ;
  \Vow ä:á _  Cns:+ Vow:  [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN:]) %^RVSH:  [%>|.#.] ; !RULE RV  !sámásis


!!  3st stems viäskár veskirin, časkes časkes ča%^RVskas%^ÁE viäskár%^ÁI%^WG%^RVSH

!kaavpug:kavpugân
!!€ kaavpug^CSH^RVSH^SVSH>ân
!!€ ka0vpug000>ân


! moolâ to moolâ:		  
		  
!!€ mool^RCâ^WG>
!!€ mool0â0>


!käähir to käävir
!!€ käähir^WG>
!!€ käävir0>

!juáhu to juávuttáá
!!€ juáh^RCu^WG^RVSH>ttáá
!!€ juáv0u00>ttáá





!! !First syllable vowel lengthening

"Root vowel lenghtening in many stems"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  no rootvowel length if stem vowel lengthens and the consonantcentre consists of two or more consonants 
%^RV:Vy <=> Vx _ Cns:+  (Vow:0) Vow: (Vow:0)  (Cns:+)  Triggers:*  (â)   %^RLEN: ;  !RULE RV !! 2syll and 3syll 
            Vx _ Cns:  (Cns:0)  Vow: (:Vow) (Cns:+)  Triggers:*  (â)   %^RLEN: %^SLEN:  [%>|.#.] ; !RULE RV  
       where Vx in (a e i o y á ö A E I O Á Ö ) ! Ánná:Ááná u, U in separate rule Root vowel u length
             Vy in (a e i o y á ö a e i o á ö ) 
       matched ;

!!€ kä^RVvnâst^WG^VBACK^RLEN>
!!€ kaavnâst000>

!!€ le^RVkk4â^WG^RLEN>
!!€ lee0hâ00>

! Left context example:     e:ä, á:ä
! Right context example:    č:i p4:0 ^WG:0 ^RLEN:0

!!€ nju^RVne^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ njuunee000>st



"Root vowel o5:u "
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ 
o5:u <=> \Vow: _ %^RV: Cns:+   i (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:)   (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV !! puhtii
